src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
koveta+V:kove v4 ;
hapata+V:happa v4 ;
vanheta+V:vanhe v4 ;
köyhetä+V:köyhe v4 ;
laajeta+V:laaje v4 ;
lapota+V:lappo v4 ;
lyhetä+V:lyhe v4 ;
pimetä+V:pime v4 ;
tyyhetä+V:tyyhe v4 ;
vaimeta+V:vaime v4 ;
lähetä+V:lähe v4 ;
vähetä+V:vähe v4 ;
lujeta+V:luje v4 ;
pajeta+V:pake v4 ;
vaijeta+V:vaike v4 ;
liijetä+V:liike v4 ;
lijetä+V:like v4 ;
oijeta+V:oike v4 ;
muijeta+V:muike v4 ;
rauheta+V:rauhe v4 ;
valjeta+V:valke v4 ;
seljetä+V:selke v4 ;
souketa+V:soukke v4 ;
tarjeta+V:tarke v4 ;
aueta+V:auke v4 ;
kyetä+V:kyke v4 ;
pehmetä+V:pehme v4 ;
kuumeta+V:kuume v4 ;
pienetä+V:piene v4 ;
lämmetä+V:lämpe v4 ;
kevetä+V:keve v4 ;
kylmetä+V:kylme v4 ;
nuoreta+V:nuore v4 ;
värretä+V:värre v4 ;
suureta+V:suure v4 ;
eđetä+V:ete v4 ;
piđetä+V:pite v4 ;
levetä+V:leve v4 ;
isota+V:iso v4 ;
mäđätä+V:mätä v4 ;
korjeta+V:korke v4 ;
degradeerata+V:degradeera v43 ; ! nowac
provideerata+V:provideera v43 ; ! nowac
refundeerata+V:refundeera v43 ; ! nowac
ekskludeerata+V:ekskludeera v43 ; ! nowac
erigeerata+V:erigeera v43 ; ! nowac
konjugeerata+V:konjugeera v43 ; ! nowac
repatrieerata+V:repatrieera v43 ; ! nowac
marsjeerata+V:marsjeera v43 ; ! nowac
flankeerata+V:flankeera v43 ; ! nowac
møbleerata+V:møbleera v43 ; ! nowac
falleerata+V:falleera v43 ; ! nowac
poleerata+V:poleera v43 ; ! nowac
immatrikuleerata+V:immatrikuleera v43 ; ! nowac
klausuleerata+V:klausuleera v43 ; ! nowac
desimeerata+V:desimeera v43 ; ! nowac
reformeerata+V:reformeera v43 ; ! nowac
promeneerata+V:promeneera v43 ; ! nowac
disiplineerata+V:disiplineera v43 ; ! nowac
medisineerata+V:medisineera v43 ; ! nowac
posisjoneerata+V:posisjoneera v43 ; ! nowac
deponeerata+V:deponeera v43 ; ! nowac
inkarneerata+V:inkarneera v43 ; ! nowac
klareerata+V:klareera v43 ; ! nowac
konspireerata+V:konspireera v43 ; ! nowac
sentreerata+V:sentreera v43 ; ! nowac
informeerata+V:informeera v43_odd ; ! nowac
glaseerata+V:glaseera v43 ; ! nowac
mumifiseerata+V:mumifiseera v43 ; ! nowac
mystifiseerata+V:mystifiseera v43 ; ! nowac
nasjonaliseerata+V:nasjonaliseera v43 ; ! nowac
siviliseerata+V:siviliseera v43 ; ! nowac
koloniseerata+V:koloniseera v43 ; ! nowac
tematiseerata+V:tematiseera v43 ; ! nowac
relativiseerata+V:relativiseera v43 ; ! nowac
trakasseerata+V:trakasseera v43 ; ! nowac
regisseerata+V:regisseera v43_odd ; ! nowac
hospiteerata+V:hospiteera v43 ; ! nowac
transplanteerata+V:transplanteera v43_odd ; ! nowac
dementeerata+V:dementeera v43 ; ! nowac
roteerata+V:roteera v43 ; ! nowac
insisteerata+V:insisteera v43 ; ! nowac
amputeerata+V:amputeera v43 ; ! nowac
intensiveerata+V:intensiveera v43 ; ! nowac
rekistreerata+V:rekistreera v43_odd ;
protesteerata+V:protesteera v43_odd ;
sahata+V:saha v43_odd ;
ohjata+V:ohja v43_odd ;
kaakata+V:kaakka v43_odd ;
lakata+V:lakka v43_odd ;
hurrata+V:hurra v43_odd ;
pilkata+V:pilkka v43_odd ;
rinkata+V:rinkka v43_odd ;
merkata+V:merkka v43_odd ;
hengata+V:henka v43_odd ;
tiskata+V:tiska v43_odd ;
vatkata+V:vatka v43_odd ;
tuhlata+V:tuhla v43_odd ;
heisata+V:heisa v43_odd ;
koulata+V:koula v43_odd ;
törmätä+V:törmä v43_odd ;
kaivata+V:kaipa v43_odd ;
vuopata+V:vuoppa v43_odd ;
mosuneerata+V:mosuneera v43_odd ;
tierata+V:tiera v43_odd ;
tasata+V:tasa v43_odd ;
kiusata+V:kiusa v43_odd ;
plaarata+V:plaara v43_odd ;
vastata+V:vasta v43_odd ;
kartata+V:kartta v43_odd ;
tervata+V:terva v43_odd ;
poovata+V:poova v43_odd ;
hävetä+V:häpe v43_odd ;
keritä+Hom2+V:keri v4_itte ; ! keritten, kerittin
livota+V:liko v43_odd ;
kađota+V:kato v43_odd ;
pumputa+V:pumppu v43_odd ;
nyökätä+V:nyökkä v43_odd ;
syklätä+V:syklä v43_odd ;
hypätä+V:hyppä v43_odd ;
pörätä+V:pörä v43_odd ;
pröövätä+V:pröövä v43_odd ;
ansaita+V:ansai v4_itte ;
havaita+V:havai v4_itte ;
karhita+V:karhi v4_itte ;
palkita+V:palki v4_itte ;
tulkita+V:tulki v4_itte ;
parkita+V:parki v4_itte ;
merkitä+V:merki v4_itte ;
naulita+V:nauli v4_itte ;
suvaita+V:suvai v4_itte ;
valita+V:vali v4_itte ;
hallita+V:halli v4_itte ;
hillitä+V:hilli v4_itte ;
villitä+V:villi v4_itte ;
mullita+V:mulli v4_itte ;
risthiinnaulita+V:risthiin#nauli v4_itte ;
tuomita+V:tuomi v4_itte ;
mainita+V:maini v4_itte ;
punnita+V:punni v4_itte ;
vieritä+V:vieri v4_itte ;
häiritä+V:häiri v4_itte ;
praatita+V:praati v4_itte ;
vaatita+V:vaati v4_itte ;
kyytitä+V:kyyti v4_itte ;
kevitä+V:kevi v4_itte ;
siivitä+V:siivi v4_itte ;
sijaita+V:sijai v4_itte ;
tarvita+V:tarvi v4_itte ;
ravita+V:ravi v4_itte ;
riemuita+V:riemui v4_itte ;
iloita+V:iloi v4_itte ;
ahkeroita+V:ahkeroi v4_oitte ;
auskaroita+V:auskaroi v4_oitte ;
evakoita+V:evakoi v4_oitte ;
sivakoita+V:sivakoi v4_oitte ;
palmikoita+V:palmikoi v4_oitte ;
joutiloita+V:joutiloi v4_oitte ;
markkinoita+V:markkinoi v4_oitte ;
kiharoita+V:kiharoi v4_oitte ;
kiikaroita+V:kiikaroi v4_oitte ;
piikaroita+V:piikaroi v4_oitte ;
nikkaroita+V:nikkaroi v4_oitte ;
naakkaroita+V:naakkaroi v4_oitte ;
palavoita+V:palavoi v4_oitte ;
haravoita+V:haravoi v4_oitte ;
haparoita+V:haparoi v4_oitte ;
kapaloita+V:kapaloi v4_oitte ;
kävelöitä+V:kävelöi v4_oitte ;
kömpyröitä+V:kömpyröi v4_oitte ;
ympäröitä+V:ympäröi v4_oitte ;
elämöitä+V:elämöi v4_oitte ;
kinneröitä+V:kinneröi v4_oitte ;
kommentoita+V:kommentoi v4_oitte ;
hutiloita+V:hutiloi v4_oitte ;
imuroita+V:imuroi v4_oitte ;
karitoita+V:karitoi v4_oitte ;
taikuroita+V:taikuroi v4_oitte ;
